Colorado statutes. TITLE 9 Safety - Industrial and Commercial
ARTICLE 4
BOILER INSPECTION

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 3 of chapter 17, C.R.S. 1963. The substantive provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1971, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1971, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Section

9-4-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"A.S.M.E. boiler and pressure vessel code" means the boiler and pressure vessel code developed by the boiler and pressure vessel committee of the American society of mechanical engineers with amendments, addenda, and interpretations thereto, made and approved by the council of said society, 1968 edition, a copy of which code is on file in the office of the boiler inspection section of the division of oil and public safety.

(1.5) "A.S.M.E. review and survey" means the review and survey of the manufacturers quality control system for the certification of authorization for the use of the A.S.M.E. applicable code symbol stamp.

"Boiler" means a closed pressure vessel in which a fluid is heated for use external to itself by the direct application of heat resulting from the combustion of fuel, solid, liquid, or gaseous, or by the use of electricity or nuclear energy.

(2.5) "Chief boiler inspector" means the person appointed by the director to oversee the boiler inspection section created in section 9-4-102.

"Colorado boiler and pressure vessel code" is used to designate the accepted reference for construction, installation, operation, and inspection of boilers and pressure vessels and will be referred to as the "Colorado boiler and pressure vessel code", which includes the A.S.M.E. boiler and pressure vessel codes and the national board inspection code.

"Condemned boiler" means a boiler which has been inspected and declared unsafe or disqualified as to legal requirements by an inspector qualified to take such action and to which has been applied a stamping or marking designating its rejection.

"Director" means the director of the division of oil and public safety or his or her designee.

"External inspection" means an inspection made when a boiler is in operation.

"Hot-water heating boiler" means a boiler operated at pressure not exceeding one hundred sixty PSIG and temperature not exceeding two hundred fifty degrees Fahrenheit for water.

"Hot-water supply boiler" means a boiler used to supply hot water operated at pressure not exceeding one hundred sixty PSIG and temperatures not exceeding two hundred fifty degrees Fahrenheit at or near the boiler outlet.

"Internal inspection" means an inspection made when a boiler is shut down with all handholes or manholes opened for inspection of its interior.

"Locomotive boiler" means a boiler mounted on a self-propelled track carrier and which is used to furnish motivating power for traveling on rails.

"Miniature boiler" means any boiler which does not exceed any of the following limits:

Sixteen inches inside diameter of shell;

Five cubic feet gross volume exclusive of casing and insulation;

One hundred pounds PSIG maximum working pressure.

"National board inspection code" means the "manual for boiler and pressure vessel inspections" published in 1970 by the national board of boiler and pressure vessel inspectors, 10th edition, and subsequent revisions.

"Nonstandard boiler" means any boiler which does not qualify as a standard boiler.

"Owner or user" means any person, firm, corporation, or business entity of whatever nature owning or operating any boiler within this state.

(14.3) "Owner-user inspection organization" means an owner or user of pressure-retaining items who maintains a regularly established inspection department, and whose organization and inspection procedures meet the requirements of the national board of boiler and pressure vessel inspectors rules or the American petroleum institute's API 510 program and are acceptable to the director.

(14.5) "Owner-user inspector" means an inspector who holds a valid national board of boiler and pressure vessel inspectors owner-user inspector commission and who has passed the examination prescribed by the national board or is an American petroleum institute certified inspector under a jurisdictionally approved owner-user inspection organization.

"Portable boiler" means an internally fired boiler which is primarily intended for temporary locational use, the construction and usage of which is obviously portable for use in multiple locations.

"Power boiler" means any boiler exceeding the miniature boiler size which generates steam or vapor at a pressure of more than fifteen pounds per square inch gauge (PSIG).

(16.5) "Pressure vessel" means a pressure vessel or a container for the containment of pressure, either internal or external. Except as exempted in section 1910.172 of the Colorado occupational safety and health general standards, such pressure may be obtained from an external source or by the application of heat from a direct or indirect source or by any combination of such methods. The scope in relation to the geometry of pressure-containing parts shall terminate at the following: The first circumferential joint for welding end connections, or the face of the first flange in bolted flanged connections, or the first threaded joint in that type of connection.

"Reinstalled boiler" means a boiler removed from its original setting and reerected at the same location or erected at a new location without change of ownership.

"Relief valve" means an automatic pressure-relieving device actuated by static pressure upstream of the valve which opens farther with an increase in pressure over the opening pressure. It is used primarily for liquid service.

"Safety relief valve" means an automatic pressure-actuated relieving device suitable for use either as a safety valve or relief valve, depending on application.

"Safety valve" means an automatic pressure-relieving device activated by static pressure upstream of the valve and characterized by full-opening pop action. It is used for steam, gas, or vapor service.

"Secondhand boiler" means a boiler in which both location and ownership have been changed after primary use.

"Section" means the boiler inspection section of the division of oil and public safety.

"Service and domestic-type water heater" means a water heater of either instantaneous or storage type used for heating or combined heating and storage of hot water for domestic or sanitary purposes or for space heating in which none of the following limitations is exceeded:

Heat input of two hundred thousand BTUs per hour;

Fluid temperature of two hundred ten degrees Fahrenheit;

Normal internal fluid capacity of one hundred twenty gallons.

"Shop inspection" means inspection of new construction of boilers or pressure vessels, and shall include review of the specifications, determination that such construction is in accordance with the applicable codes, and certification to the national board and to the A.S.M.E. that such completed new construction is eligible to be stamped with the appropriate A.S.M.E. symbol.

"Special boiler inspector" means an inspector who has received and maintained in force a commission as inspector issued by the national board of boiler and pressure vessel inspectors and authorized by the boiler inspection section to inspect or insure boilers in the state of Colorado.

"Standard boiler" means a boiler which bears the stamp of the state of Colorado or another state which has adopted a standard boiler construction equivalent to that required by the Colorado boiler and pressure vessel code or a boiler which bears the A.S.M.E. stamp.

"State boiler inspector" means any boiler inspector employed by the division of oil and public safety.

"Steam-heating boiler" means a boiler operated at pressure not exceeding fifteen PSIG for steam.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 267, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 17-3-1.

L. 76:

(28) amended and (1.5) and (16.5) added, p. 362, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1), (22), and (27) amended, p. 1134, § 56, effective June 5.

L. 2009:

(23)(b) amended, (HB 09-1309), ch. 234, p. 1071, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 2011:

(2.5) added and (5) amended, (HB 11-1050), ch. 8, p. 16, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(14.3) and (14.5) added, (HB 12-1217), ch. 51, p. 184, § 1, effective August 8.

9-4-102. Boiler inspection section - created - director - chief boiler inspector - inspectors - qualifications.

The director shall carry out the provisions of this article 4. The director may appoint a chief boiler inspector to oversee the boiler inspection section, which is created in the division of oil and public safety. The boiler inspection section is a type 2 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105. The chief boiler inspector and each state boiler inspector must be qualified from practical experience in the construction, maintenance, repair, or operation of boilers as a mechanical or safety engineer, steam engineer, boilermaker, or boiler inspector of not less than five years' actual experience to enable him or her to judge the safety of boilers for use as such. Neither the chief boiler inspector nor any state boiler inspector shall be interested directly or indirectly in the manufacture, ownership, or sale of boilers or boiler supplies.

The chief boiler inspector and state boiler inspectors shall be reimbursed for necessary traveling expenses as provided by law.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 269, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 17-3-2.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 1135, § 57, effective June 5.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (HB 11-1050), ch. 8, p. 16, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3386, § 97, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

9-4-103. Duties - rules.

The director shall keep in his or her office a complete and accurate record of the names of owners or users of boilers inspected, giving a full description of the boiler, the pressure allowed, the date when last inspected, and by whom. The director or chief boiler inspector shall investigate and report to the division of oil and public safety the cause of any boiler explosion that occurs within the state. Definitions and rules for the safe construction, installation, inspection, operation, maintenance, and repair of boilers and pressure vessels in the state of Colorado, in addition or supplemental to the existing rules, shall be formulated by the section under the direction of the chief boiler inspector and shall become effective upon approval by the director.

The definitions and rules so formulated for new construction shall be based upon and at all times follow the generally accepted nationwide engineering standards, formulas, and practices established and pertaining to boiler and pressure vessel construction and safety, and the section, with the approval of the director of the division of oil and public safety, may adopt an existing codification thereof known as the boiler and pressure vessel code of the American society of mechanical engineers, and when so adopted and incorporated by reference pursuant to section 24-4-103 (12.5), C.R.S., shall constitute a part of the whole of the definitions and rules of the section.

The section, under the direction of the director, shall formulate rules establishing a schedule for the inspection of boilers and pressure vessels and may formulate other rules governing the inspection, operation, maintenance, and repair of boilers and pressure vessels in addition and supplemental to those rules that are part of the Colorado boiler construction code as originally enacted and amended. The rules so formulated shall be based upon and at all times follow the generally accepted nationwide engineering standards and may be based upon those portions of an existing published codification of such rules known as the inspection code of the national board of boiler and pressure vessel inspectors as are considered by the section to be properly applicable. Rules formulated by the section and identification of those portions of the national board inspection code which are declared to be applicable shall be made available to all persons directly affected by a publication which will be prepared and issued, upon request, to such persons by the section.

Inspectors shall carefully inspect every boiler used or proposed to be used in this state for steaming, hot-water heating purposes, or hot-water supply, including all attachments and connections, in accordance with the inspection schedule established pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 270, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 17-3-3.

L. 2000:

(3) and (4) amended, p. 163, § 1, effective March 17.

L. 2001:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1135, § 58, effective June 5.

L. 2011:

(1) amended, (HB 11-1050), ch. 8, p. 17, § 3, effective August 10.

9-4-104. Exemptions.

The following are exempt from the provisions of this article:

Boilers located in private residences;

Boilers located in apartment houses having less than six family units;

Any city or town where boiler inspectors of comparable capability to state boiler inspectors are employed, where adequate records of boiler inspections are maintained, and where there is in effect a boiler inspection code comparable to that of the state pursuant to the ordinances of said city or town. A city or town not now providing such service may, upon application to the director of the division of oil and public safety with submission of proof of such comparability, be authorized by the director of the division of oil and public safety to establish a boiler inspection system that is exempt from the provisions of this article.

Service and domestic-type water heaters;

Boilers owned or operated by the federal government;

Locomotive boilers of carriers subject to the federal locomotive inspection law.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 270, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 17-3-4.

L. 2001:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1136, § 59, effective June 5.

9-4-105. Inspections of boilers.

Inspectors making internal inspections of boilers shall give the owner or user not less than five days' prior notice of the time when they will make such inspections.

An inspector may, upon seeing conditions that, in the inspector's discretion, indicate that there has been deterioration of any pressure-containing portion of a boiler or pressure vessel, assess the leak tightness capability of a boiler or pressure vessel by conducting a pressure test in accordance with the pressure testing considerations and guidance contained in the national board inspection code. The owner or user of the pressure-retaining boiler or pressure vessel shall provide any necessary labor and equipment required to apply the pressure test prescribed by the inspector.

If at any time an inspector finds a boiler or pressure vessel which, according to the Colorado boiler and pressure vessel code, is unsafe after inspection of same, he shall condemn and forbid its future use until satisfactory repairs are made or said boiler is replaced.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 271, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 17-3-5.

L. 2009:

(2) amended, (HB 09-1309), ch. 234, p. 1071, § 2, effective May 4.

9-4-106. Owner to report boilers - wrongful use - inspection of new installations.

It is the duty of the owner or user of boilers, except those boilers exempt from the provisions of this article under section 9-4-104, used or which are to be used in this state, to report to the section the location of newly installed or relocated boilers.

Before the installers of any boiler have boilers placed in service, they shall notify the section, which, within ten days or as soon thereafter as possible from the date of receiving such notification, shall send an inspector to examine said boilers to determine that the construction, material, bracing, fuel and fluid supply systems, control apparatus, combustion air and ventilating air, electric wiring, piping, and all other parts of such boilers are such as to assure the safety of the boilers.

Upon completion of installation, all boilers shall be inspected by a state boiler inspector. At the time of inspection, each boiler shall be assigned a serial number by the inspector, which serial number shall be stamped on or affixed to the boiler.

The serial number and letters, whether stamped on or affixed to the boiler, shall not be less than five-sixteenths of an inch in height, and the serial number shall be preceded by the letters "Colo". The stamping shall not be concealed by lagging or paint and shall be exposed at all times. Metal tags shall be furnished by the section on which the assigned number may be stamped. The tag shall be securely affixed to the boiler in the area of the manufacturer's identification and must be used when the metal of which the boiler is made may be damaged by direct stamping.

The owners or users of boilers, or engineers in charge of same, shall not allow a greater pressure in any boiler than is stated on the certificate of inspection issued by the section. No person or business entity shall use any boiler that has been condemned as unsafe by a state boiler inspector. No person or business entity shall operate a boiler without a valid certificate of inspection.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 271, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 17-3-6.

9-4-106.5. Owner to report boilers taken out of service.

It is the duty of the owner or user of boilers used in this state, except those boilers exempt from the provisions of this article under section 9-4-104, to report to the section the location and state serial number of boilers that have been taken out of service but not removed from the premises. For purposes of this article, a boiler is not "taken out of service" if it is temporarily shut down for routine maintenance or minor repairs.

The section, under the direction of the director, shall formulate rules for the safe removal from service of boilers condemned pursuant to section 9-4-105 (3) or voluntarily taken out of service by the owner or user.

A boiler that has been condemned or voluntarily taken out of service may be placed back in service, subject to any applicable requirements for satisfactory repair, imposed pursuant to section 9-4-105 (3), and subject to compliance with section 9-4-106. For purposes of section 9-4-106, such a boiler shall be treated as a new boiler.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 164, § 2, effective March 17.

9-4-107. Certificate.

If, upon inspection, a boiler is found to comply with the Colorado boiler and pressure vessel code, the owner or user thereof shall pay directly to the section such fee as is prescribed by section 9-4-109, and the division of oil and public safety shall issue to such owner or user an inspection certificate bearing the date of inspection and the date of expiration of the certificate and specifying the maximum pressure under which the boiler may be operated.

An inspection certificate is valid for the period stated on the face of the certificate.

The certificate of inspection or a copy of the certificate of inspection shall be posted in the room containing the boiler inspected or, in the case of a portable boiler, shall be kept in a metal container to be fastened to the boiler. Failure to properly exhibit the certificate of inspection will result in another inspection of the boiler and demand for inspection fees.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 272, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 17-3-7.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 1136, § 60, effective June 5.

L. 2011:

(2) and (3) amended, (HB 11-1050), ch. 8, p. 17, § 4, effective August 10.

9-4-108. Violation by owner or user - penalty - enforcement.

If the owner of any boiler fails to report the location of such boiler to the section, the owner is guilty of a misdemeanor, and, if the owner or his agent fails to have said boiler ready for internal inspection as provided in this article, said owner shall be liable to pay fees and expenses of the inspector incurred in the inspection of any such boiler.

Any owner who fails or refuses to comply with all requirements or directions of this article pertaining to notification of boiler placement, replacement, or operation; condones operation of condemned boilers; refuses a reasonable request to inspect any boiler used for heating or water supply service or any similar use; refuses to pay inspection and expenses or penalties or license fees; operates any boiler or similar device in defiance of a division of oil and public safety order or an order of the director shall, upon notice, cease to use or operate or allow the use or operation of any approved or nonapproved boiler or water-heating equipment owned by him or her until permission to resume use of such equipment is granted by the director.

Actions shall be instituted by the attorney general or the district attorney, or may be instituted by the city attorney of any city, to prosecute such acts in violation of this article within his jurisdiction as may come to his knowledge or to enforce the provisions of this article independently and without specific direction of the director. Each such violation shall be a separate offense.

Any person convicted of a violation of this article 4 commits a petty offense.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 272, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 17-3-8.

L. 76:

(3) amended, p. 363, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(2) amended, p. 1136, § 61, effective June 5.

L. 2021:

(4) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3145, § 102, effective March 1, 2022.

9-4-108.5. Variances.

Any owner or user may apply to the director for a rule or order for a variance from the standards, rules, regulations, or requirements of this article, upon providing such information as prescribed by the director. The director shall issue such rule or order if he determines that the proponent of the variance has demonstrated that the construction, installation, and operation of the boiler or pressure vessel will be as safe as if the standards, rules, regulations, or requirements were complied with. The rule or order so issued shall prescribe the construction, installation, operation, maintenance, and repair conditions that the owner or user must maintain. Such a rule or order may be modified or revoked upon application by an owner or user or by the director on his own motion at any time after six months from its issuance.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire section added, p. 363, § 3, effective July 1.

9-4-109. Fees for boiler and pressure vessel inspection certificates.

There shall be paid for the issuance of a certificate of boiler or pressure vessel inspection of each individual boiler or pressure vessel, regardless of how it is joined or connected, according to this article by the owner or user of said boiler or pressure vessel, such fees as shall be established by the director of the division of oil and public safety by rule; except that such fees shall not exceed the amount necessary to accumulate and maintain in the boiler inspection fund a reserve sufficient to defray the division's administrative expenses for a period of two months, and in no event shall the basic fee for an annual inspection exceed one hundred fifty dollars for an internal inspection or eighty-five dollars for an external inspection. The basic fee for a biennial or triennial inspection shall not exceed eighty-five dollars. The division shall not charge for an inspection other than to assess the fees established pursuant to this subsection (1). Any fees established pursuant to subparagraphs (III) to (V) of this paragraph (a) or pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) shall be in addition to the basic fee.
(1) (a) (I) There shall be paid for the issuance of a certificate of boiler or pressure vessel inspection of each individual boiler or pressure vessel, regardless of how it is joined or connected, according to this article by the owner or user of said boiler or pressure vessel, such fees as shall be established by the director of the division of oil and public safety by rule; except that such fees shall not exceed the amount necessary to accumulate and maintain in the boiler inspection fund a reserve sufficient to defray the division's administrative expenses for a period of two months, and in no event shall the basic fee for an annual inspection exceed one hundred fifty dollars for an internal inspection or eighty-five dollars for an external inspection. The basic fee for a biennial or triennial inspection shall not exceed eighty-five dollars. The division shall not charge for an inspection other than to assess the fees established pursuant to this subsection (1). Any fees established pursuant to subparagraphs (III) to (V) of this paragraph (a) or pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) shall be in addition to the basic fee.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2001, p. 529, § 1, effective July 1, 2001.)

In addition to the basic fee established in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a), the division may assess a reinspection fee for any boiler condemned pursuant to section

9-4-105 (3)

. The reinspection fee shall be assessed and collected for each reinspection until the repairs are deemed satisfactory in accordance with section

9-4-105 (3)

.

In addition to the basic fee established in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a), the division may assess a disconnection inspection fee.

In addition to the basic inspection fee established in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a), the division shall assess a certificate of boiler operation issuance fee not to exceed twenty-five dollars per certificate.

There shall be paid, for the services provided by the national board of boiler and pressure vessel commissioned inspectors, fees as provided in the following schedule:

Secondhand boiler or equipment at the request of the owner for certificate .................... $30.00 plus expenses

National board shop inspection or A.S.M.E. quality control survey
.................... $100.00 1/2 day,
$200.00 full day plus travel and subsistence expense (1/2 day minimum).

The section may prorate the boiler inspection fees. Twenty-five percent of the inspection fee shall be charged for a period up to and including twenty-five percent of the certificate term. Fifty percent of the inspection fee shall be charged for periods up to and including fifty percent of the certificate term. Seventy-five percent of the inspection fee shall be charged for periods up to and including seventy-five percent of the certificate term. The full fee shall be charged for periods exceeding seventy-five percent of the certificate term.

(2.5) Repealed.

All boiler or pressure vessel inspection certificate fees shall be paid within thirty days from the date of inspection to the department of labor and employment. Upon failure to pay the department of labor and employment, the chief boiler inspector shall issue an order to the owner or user to cease and desist the use or operation or allowing the use or operation of the boiler or pressure vessel until permission to resume use of such equipment is granted by the director.

All fees collected by the department of labor and employment under the provisions of this article shall be used to defray the salaries and operating expenses incurred in the administration of this article and shall be appropriated for such purposes by the general assembly. Such moneys shall be transferred to the state treasurer, who shall deposit the same to the credit of the boiler inspection fund, which fund is hereby created.

If any person who is required to pay a fee pursuant to subsection (1) of this section fails or refuses to remit such fee, the department of labor and employment shall proceed at once to collect the fee by employing such legal processes as may be necessary for that purpose.

The state treasurer shall invest any portion of the boiler inspection fund which is not needed for immediate use. All interest earned upon such invested portion shall be credited to the fund and used for the same purposes and in the same manner as other moneys in the fund. Such moneys may be invested in the types of investments authorized in sections 24-36-109, 24-36-112, and 24-36-113, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 273, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 17-3-9.

L. 76:

R&RE, p. 363, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(1)(a)(I), (1)(a)(II), (1)(b)(I), and (1)(b)(II) amended and (4), (5), and (6) added, p. 445, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(2.5) added, p. 548, § 1, effective May 28.

L. 92:

(1)(a), (2.5), (3), (4), and (5) amended, p. 1814, § 1, effective March 20.

L. 97:

(2.5) repealed, p. 1477, § 19, effective June 3.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) amended, p. 164, § 3, effective March 17.

L. 2001:

(1)(a)(I) amended, p. 1136, § 62, effective June 5; (1)(a)(I) and (1)(a)(II) amended and (1)(a)(V) added, p. 529, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(a)(I) amended, p. 985, § 3, effective May 21.

L. 2011:

(2) amended, (HB 11-1050), ch. 8, p. 17, § 5, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1)(a)(I) by House Bill 01-1373 and House Bill 01-1279 were harmonized.

9-4-110. Special inspectors.

In addition to the boiler inspectors authorized by this article, the section shall, upon request of any company authorized to insure against loss from explosion of boilers in this state, issue to any boiler inspectors of said company commissions as special boiler inspectors. Each such inspector, before receiving a commission, shall satisfy the division of oil and public safety that such inspector is properly qualified to perform such inspections. Possession of a valid commission as inspector issued by the national board of boiler and pressure vessel inspectors shall be considered to be proper qualification.

Such special boiler inspectors shall receive no salary from, nor shall any of their expenses be paid by, the state, and continuance of a special boiler inspector's commission shall be conditioned upon such special boiler inspector's continuing in the employ of the boiler insurance company duly authorized as aforesaid and upon the maintenance of the standards imposed by the division of oil and public safety. Such special boiler inspectors shall perform their functions in accordance with the instructions for special boiler inspectors formulated by the section.

Such special boiler inspectors shall inspect all boilers insured by their respective companies and, when so inspected, the owners or users of such insured boilers shall pay Colorado boiler inspection fees for the issuance of a certificate of inspection.

Each company employing such special boiler inspectors, within thirty days following each boiler inspection made by such inspectors, shall file a report of such inspection with the section upon appropriate forms promulgated by the division of oil and public safety.

If the division of oil and public safety has reason to believe that a special boiler inspector is no longer qualified to hold an appointment or commission, the division of oil and public safety or its selected agent, upon not less than ten days' written notice to the inspector and the inspector's employer, shall hold a hearing at which such inspector and the inspector's employer shall have an opportunity to be heard. If, as a result of such hearing, the division of oil and public safety or its selected agent finds that such inspector is no longer qualified to hold an appointment or commission, the division of oil and public safety, or upon recommendation of its selected agent, shall revoke or suspend such appointment or commission.

A person whose appointment or commission has been suspended shall be entitled to apply, after ninety days from the date of such suspension, for reinstatement of such appointment or commission.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 275, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 17-3-10.

L. 2001:

(1), (2), (4), and (5) amended, p. 1137, § 63, effective June 5; (3) amended, p. 530, § 2, effective July 1.

9-4-110.5. Owner-user inspection organizations - registration.

A person, firm, partnership, or corporation operating boilers or pressure vessels may seek approval and registration as an owner-user inspection organization by filing an application with the director on prescribed forms.

The applicant shall show the name of the organization and its principal address and the name and address of the person or persons having supervision over inspections made by the organization on the application and registration. The applicant shall report changes in supervisory personnel to the director within thirty days after the change.

Each owner-user inspection organization shall:

Conduct inspection of its nonexempt boilers and pressure vessels, utilizing only qualified inspection personnel;

Retain on file at the location where equipment is inspected a true record or copy of the report of each inspection signed by the owner-user inspector who made the inspection;

Promptly notify the director of any boiler or pressure vessel that does not meet requirements for safe operation;

Maintain inspection records that include a list of nonexempt boilers and pressure vessels, showing the serial number and the abbreviated description as may be necessary for identification, the date of the last inspection of each unit, the approximate date of the next inspection, and documentation of all repairs. Such inspection records shall be readily available for examination by the director, the chief boiler inspector, or their designee during business hours.

Transmit a statement annually to the director, on a date mutually agreed upon. The individual having supervision over the inspections made during the period covered shall sign the statement and shall include the number of vessels inspected during the year and shall certify that each inspection was conducted in accordance with the inspection requirements in the Colorado boiler and pressure vessel rules.

A state-issued certificate of inspection is required for boilers and pressure vessels inspected by an owner-user inspection organization when all of the requirements in this section are met.

An individual or organization performing an inspection pursuant to this section shall have liability insurance appropriate for the size and scope of the relevant inspection.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (HB 12-1217), ch. 51, p. 184, § 2, effective August 8.

9-4-111. Penalty - inspector fails to perform duty.

An inspector of boilers, for every failure to perform his or her duties, commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 275, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 17-3-11.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3145, § 103, effective March 1, 2022.